dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="sk/ina__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>inas</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ina</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inits</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>init</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>in</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ens</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ines</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ine</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inande</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inandes</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ines</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ins</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iner</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ines</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ine</l><r>ina<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gl/ädjas__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ädjas</l><r>ädjas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>atts</l><r>ädjas<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äds</l><r>ädjas<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ädes</l><r>ädjas<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>addes</l><r>ädjas<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äds</l><r>ädjas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ädes</l><r>ädjas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/ädja__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ädjas</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ädja</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>atts</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>att</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äd</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>att</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>atts</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>add</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>adds</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>adda</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>addas</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>adde</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>addes</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>adda</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>addas</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>adda</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>addas</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>addes</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>adde</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ädjande</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ädjandes</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ädes</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äds</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ädjer</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äder</l><r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tillstädja"><i>tillst</i><par n="st/ädja__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="påskina"><i>påsk</i><par n="sk/ina__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="glädjas"><i>gl</i><par n="gl/ädjas__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skina"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ina__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="städja"><i>st</i><par n="st/ädja__vblex"/></e>
